Utah statutes.
53-3-208.   Restrictions.

(1) (a)  When granting a license, the division may for good cause impose restrictions, suitable to the licensee's driving ability, for the type of motor vehicle or special mechanical control devices required on a motor vehicle that the licensee may drive.

(b)  The division may impose other restrictions on the licensee as it determines appropriate to assure safe driving of a motor vehicle by the licensee.

(2)  The division may either grant a special restricted license or may set forth restrictions upon the regular license certificate.

(3) (a)  The division may suspend or revoke any license upon receiving satisfactory evidence of any violation of the restrictions imposed on the license.

(b)  Each licensee is entitled to a hearing for a suspension or revocation under this chapter.

(4)  It is a class C misdemeanor for a person to drive a motor vehicle in violation of the restrictions imposed on his license under this section.

